src/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
LEXICON adv

+Adv: # ;

LEXICON Adverbs

ӄарын adv "morning"      ;
ай adv "again"           ;
ненты adv "together"     ;
нөты adv "now"           ;
ті̄ adv "now"             ; ! should have long i
мунтык adv "all"         ;
моӄынӓ adv "home, back?" ;
